Hawaii statutes.
[§584-19] Right to counsel; free transcript
on appeal. (a) At a pre-trial hearing and in further proceedings, any
party may be represented by counsel. The court may appoint counsel for a party
who is financially unable to obtain counsel.

(b) If a party is financially unable to pay
the cost of a transcript, the court may furnish on request a transcript for
purposes of appeal. [L 1975, c 66, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next